test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-peivv_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - peiʹvv a-stem päivä: # Noun - full paradigm
     peiʹvv+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: peiʹvv
     peiʹvv+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: peeiʹv
     peiʹvv+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: peeiʹv
     peiʹvv+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: peivva
     peiʹvv+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: peeiʹvest
     peiʹvv+N+Sg+Com+Indef: peeiʹvin
     peiʹvv+N+Ess+Indef: peiʹvven
     peiʹvv+N+Par+Indef: peiʹvved
     peiʹvv+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [peeiʹvtaa, peeiʹvtää]
     peiʹvv+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: peeiʹv
     peiʹvv+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: peeiʹvi
     peiʹvv+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: peeiʹvid
     peiʹvv+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: peeiʹvid
     peiʹvv+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: peeiʹvin
     peiʹvv+N+Pl+Com+Indef: peeiʹvivuiʹm
     peiʹvv+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [peeiʹvitaa, peeiʹvitää]
